Maine, session 132, LD74.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6209, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 196, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Review cycle. The commissioner shall conduct a review of the content standards
and performance indicators by content area on a 5-year cycle beginning in the 2015-2016
7-year cycle beginning in the 2025-2026 school year. The review of the content standards
and performance indicators for the content area of social studies, including student
achievement of proficiency in personal finance, must be included in the commissioner's
review during the 2015-2016 school year. Any changes that are recommended must be
approved through the same process used for establishment of the system of learning results.
Beginning in the 2016-2017 school year, the The commissioner shall review and make
recommendations for objective measures that may be used to substantiate school
certifications of postsecondary readiness. The review of the content standards and
performance indicators for the content area of health, physical education and wellness,
including instruction on affirmative consent, communication and decision making
regarding sexual activity and the effects of alcoholic drinks, stimulants and narcotics on
the ability to give affirmative consent, communicate and make appropriate decisions, must
be included in the commissioner's review beginning in the 2019‑2020 school year.
Page 1 - 132LR0130(03)